Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.195.090

Online school programs.

(1) If a private school that has been approved under this chapter by the state board of education seeks approval also to offer and administer an online school program as defined under RCW 28A.250.010, including under contract with a third party, the requirements for minimum instructional hour offerings under RCW 28A.195.010(1) shall be deemed met for the online school program. A residential dwelling of a parent, guardian, or custodian shall be deemed an adequate physical facility for students enrolled in the online school program. The online school program is not required to be offered for the same grade levels as the approved private school.

(2) The state board of education may approve an online school program under this section that meets other applicable requirements under this chapter.

(3) No private school offering and administering an online program under this section, third party that contracts with a private school to offer and administer an online program, or parent or guardian providing an online program may receive state funding to provide the program.

[ 2013 c 161 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2013 c 161: "The legislature supports student access to a variety of educational options, both public and private. However, state policies regarding the approval of private schools were created before online learning was possible. Consequently, these policies do not provide for approval criteria that are sufficiently flexible to accommodate online learning. While some policy adjustments have been made to permit public online choices, current law does not provide a clear process for private schools to obtain state approval to offer similar learning options." [ 2013 c 161 s 1.]